Nevada, session 83, AB193.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 217 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a law
enforcement agency shall, upon written request by a victim of
domestic violence, furnish within 1 month, free, complete and
unaltered copies of all reports of the law enforcement agency
concerning the domestic violence, regardless of whether the report
has been closed by the law enforcement agency. A law
enforcement agency may, as appropriate, redact personal
identifying information from any reports provided pursuant to this
subsection.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Law enforcement agency” means any agency, office or
bureau of this State or a political subdivision of this State, the
primary duty of which is to enforce the law.
(b) “Personal identifying information” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 205.4617.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(c) “Victim of domestic violence” means a person who is a
victim of an act that constitutes domestic violence pursuant to
NRS 33.018.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)